Washington statutes.
RCW 33.20.005

Deposits by individuals governed by chapter 30.22 RCW.

Deposits made by individuals in an association are governed by *chapter 30.22 RCW.

[ 1981 c 192 s 29.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.